Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.070

Strip, body cavity searches—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 10.79.060 through 10.79.110.

(1) "Strip search" means having a person remove or arrange some or all of his or her clothing so as to permit an inspection of the genitals, buttocks, anus, or undergarments of the person or breasts of a female person.

(2) "Body cavity search" means the touching or probing of a person's body cavity, whether or not there is actual penetration of the body cavity.

(3) "Body cavity" means the stomach or rectum of a person and the vagina of a female person.

(4) "Law enforcement agency" and "law enforcement officer" include local departments of corrections created pursuant to *RCW 70.48.090(3) and employees thereof.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 42 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 70.48.090 was amended by 2007 c 13 s 1, changing subsection (3) to subsection (4).

Effective date—Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 10.79.060.